Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 4. Emergency Management Assistance Compact

Cross references. —

For provisions pertaining to National Guard Service and Wyoming State Guard Service outside of the State, see §§

19-9-209

and

19-10-104

, respectively.

Editor's notes. —

See also § 19-13-412(a), which provides that the compact becomes operative upon its enactment into law by any two states and therefor would become effective for any other state upon its enactment by the state. The legislative service office confirmed that the requisite number of states had enacted the compact such that the compact would become effective when enacted.

§ 19-13-401.
Compact provisions.

The Emergency Management Assistance Compact is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in form substantially the same. W.S.

19-13-401

through

19-13-414

shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Management Assistance Compact.”

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-402.
Purposes and authorities.

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states that enact this compact, hereinafter called party states. For the purposes of this agreement, the term “states” is taken to mean the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia and all United States territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is duly declared by the governor of the affected state, whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster or emergency aspects of resource shortages.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency-related exercises, testing or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies for actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states’ national guard forces, either in accordance with the National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact or by mutual agreement between states.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1; 2006, ch. 59, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, deleted the proviso at the end of (c) concerning mutual assistance or cooperation limitations.

§ 19-13-403.
General implementation.

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes many emergencies transcend political jurisdictional boundaries and that intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes that there will be emergencies, which require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full, and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the federal government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state, shall be the underlying principle on which all provisions of this compact shall be understood.

On behalf of the governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for homeland security will be responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” in (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-404.
Party state responsibilities.

It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this section. In formulating the plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

Review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, or enemy attack;

Review party states’ individual homeland security plans and develop a plan, which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency;

Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans;

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries;

Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services and resources, both human and material;

Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this agreement shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within thirty (30) days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, including but not limited to fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services and search and rescue;

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed;

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party’s response and a point of contact at that location.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned homeland security responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States government, with free exchange of information, plans and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “homeland security” for “emergency management” in (a)(ii) and (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

§ 19-13-405.
Limitations.

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take the action necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for that state. Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights and privileges afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect or loaned resources remain in an official capacity in the receiving state, whichever is longer.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-406.
Licenses and permits.

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical or other skills, and when assistance is requested by the receiving party state, the person shall be deemed licensed, certified or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving the skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to limitations and conditions the governor of the requesting state may prescribe by executive order or otherwise.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-407.
Liability.

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes. Any party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in this state pursuant to this compact shall be liable for any act or omission on the part of the forces while so engaged or for the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. —

See §§

1-39-101

and 1-39-103(a)(viii).

§ 19-13-408.
Supplementary agreements.

If it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two (2) or more states may differ from that among the states that are party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affect any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel and equipment and supplies.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-409.
Compensation.

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of the forces in case the members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-410.
Reimbursement.

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with the requests; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part the loss, damage, expense or other cost, or may loan the equipment or donate the services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further, that any two (2) or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Expenses under W.S.

19-13-409

shall not be reimbursable under this provision.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-411.
Evacuation.

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. The plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting the evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of the evacuees to other areas or the importing of additional materials, supplies and all other relevant factors. The plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which the evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for the evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care and like items. The expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation of the evacuees.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

§ 19-13-412.
Implementation.

This compact shall become operative immediately upon its enactment into law by any two (2) states; thereafter, this compact shall become effective for any other state upon its enactment by that state.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no withdrawal shall take effect until thirty (30) days after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. The action shall not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of supplementary agreements entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the federal department of homeland security and other appropriate agencies of the United States government.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “department of homeland security” for “emergency management agency” in (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 169, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

See editor's note under the article heading.

§ 19-13-413.
Validity.

This act shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in W.S.

19-13-402

hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or its applicability to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this act and its applicability to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The meaning of “this act,” as referred to in this section, is apparently its enacting legislation, Laws 2003, ch. 21.

§ 19-13-414.
Additional provisions.

Nothing in this compact shall authorize or permit the use of military force by the national guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the president is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the Army or the Air Force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under Section 1385 of Title 18, United States Code.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 21, § 1.